Utah statutes.
10-3-703.   Criminal penalties for violation of ordinance -- Civil penalties prohibited -- Exceptions.

(1)  The governing body of each municipality may impose a minimum criminal penalty for the violation of any municipal ordinance by a fine not to exceed the maximum class B misdemeanor fine under Section 76-3-301 or by a term of imprisonment up to six months, or by both the fine and term of imprisonment.

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the governing body may prescribe a minimum civil penalty for the violation of any municipal ordinance by a fine not to exceed the maximum class B misdemeanor fine under Section 76-3-301.

(b)  A municipality may not impose a civil penalty and adjudication for the violation of a municipal moving traffic ordinance.

